Wisconsin, session 2025, AB4.
do enact as follows:AB4,11Section 1. 115.28 (55v) of the statutes is created to read:AB4,2,62115.28 (55v) Civics education curriculum; report. Beginning in the 32027-28 school year, annually compile and submit information the department 4received in the previous school year under ss. 118.40 (2r) (b) 2. m. and (2x) (b) 2. m., 5118.60 (2) (a) 10., 119.23 (2) (a) 10., and 121.02 (1) (L) 9. to the appropriate standing 6committees of the legislature under s. 13.172 (3).AB4,27Section 2. 118.165 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB4,3,48118.165 (1) (d) The program provides a sequentially progressive curriculum of 9fundamental instruction in reading, language arts, mathematics, social studies, 1science, and health. This subsection does not require the program to include in its 2curriculum any concept, topic, or practice in conflict with the program’s religious 3doctrines or mission or to exclude from its curriculum any concept, topic, or practice 4consistent with the program’s religious doctrines or mission.AB4,35Section 3. 118.33 (1) (a) 1. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB4,3,76118.33 (1) (a) 1. b. At least 3 credits of social studies, including state and local 7government, that include at least 0.5 credit of civics instruction.AB4,48Section 4. 118.40 (2r) (b) 2. m. of the statutes is created to read:AB4,3,129118.40 (2r) (b) 2. m. A requirement that the charter school’s curriculum 10include the instruction in civics required under s. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. and that the 11charter school annually report to the department regarding how the charter school 12governing board is meeting the requirement under this subd. 2. m.AB4,513Section 5. 118.40 (2x) (b) 2. m. of the statutes is created to read:AB4,3,1714118.40 (2x) (b) 2. m. A requirement that the charter school’s curriculum 15include the instruction in civics required under s. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. and that the 16charter school annually report to the department regarding how the charter school 17governing board is meeting the requirement under this subd. 2. m.AB4,618Section 6. 118.60 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is created to read:AB4,3,2219118.60 (2) (a) 10. The private school includes in its curriculum the instruction 20in civics required under s. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. and annually reports to the department 21regarding how the private school is meeting the requirement under this 22subdivision.AB4,723Section 7. 119.23 (2) (a) 10. of the statutes is created to read:AB4,4,41119.23 (2) (a) 10. The private school includes in its curriculum the instruction 2in civics required under s. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. and annually reports to the department 3regarding how the private school is meeting the requirement under this 4subdivision.AB4,85Section 8. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. of the statutes is created to read:AB4,4,86121.02 (1) (L) 9. Include instruction in civics that includes all of the following 7topics and pupil development goals and annually report to the department how the 8school board is meeting the requirement under this subdivision:AB4,4,179a. An understanding of pupils’ shared rights and responsibilities as residents 10of this state and the United States and of the founding principles of the United 11States, including the history and content of the Declaration of Independence, 12including natural and popular sovereignty and self-evident truth, and how those 13concepts form the philosophical foundations of government; the history, meaning, 14significance, and effect of provisions of the U.S. Constitution and the Bill of Rights 15and how those documents provide the structure of government; and the arguments 16in support of adopting the republican form of government, including those 17arguments contained in the Federalist Papers.AB4,4,1918b. A sense of civic pride and desire to participate regularly with government at 19the local, state, and federal levels.AB4,4,2120c. An understanding of the process for effectively advocating before 21governmental bodies and officials.AB4,5,222d. An understanding of the civic-minded expectations of an upright and 23desirable citizenry that recognizes and accepts responsibility for preserving and 1defending the benefits of liberty inherited from previous generations and secured 2by the U.S. Constitution.AB4,5,63e. Knowledge of other nations’ governing philosophies, including communism, 4socialism, and totalitarianism, and an understanding of how those philosophies 5compare with the philosophy and principles of freedom and representative 6democracy essential to the founding principles of the United States.AB4,97Section 9. Initial applicability.AB4,5,108(1) The treatment of s. 118.40 (2r) (b) 2. m. and (2x) (b) 2. m. first applies to a 9contract that is entered into, renewed, or modified on the effective date of this 10subsection.AB4,5,1311(2) The treatment of ss. 118.60 (2) (a) 10. and 119.23 (2) (a) 10. first applies to 12an application to attend a private school under a parental choice program in the 132027-28 school year.AB4,5,1514(3) The treatment of s. 121.02 (1) (L) 9. first applies to curriculum for the 152027-28 school year.AB4,5,1716(4) The treatment of s. 118.33 (1) (a) 1. b. first applies to a pupil who 17graduates in the 2030-31 school year.AB4,1018Section 10. Effective date.AB4,5,1919(1) This act takes effect on July 1, 2026.AB4,5,2020